New Jersey, session 222, A389.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 2 of P.L.2018, c.33 (C.5:12A-11) is amended to read as follows: 2.  a.  The division shall issue all sports wagering licenses and renewals thereof to casinos.  The racing commission shall issue all initial sports wagering licenses to racetracks but the division shall have responsibility for the renewal thereof.  In addition to casino games permitted pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1977, c.110 (C.5:12-1 et seq.), a casino which holds a sports wagering license issued by the division may operate a sports pool in accordance with the provisions of this act and applicable regulations promulgated pursuant to this act.  A racetrack which holds an initial sports wagering license issued by the racing commission or a sports wagering license that has been renewed by the division may operate a sports pool in accordance with the provisions of this act and applicable regulations promulgated pursuant to this act. The division may issue a transactional waiver to allow the continued operation of an established sports wagering lounge and authorization to conduct up to three online sports wagering operations when a racetrack that holds a license issued by the racing commission pursuant to P.L.1940, c.17 (C.5:5-22, et seq.) undergoes a material change in ownership to a degree such that it would be required to file a new application with the racing commission in order to continue to operate pursuant to P.L.1940, c.17 (C.5:5-22 et seq.).  A transactional waiver issued pursuant to this section shall be for an initial period of up to six months and may be renewed during the pendency of the racing commission's consideration of a new application for up to three one-year periods, but the division shall have the right to reexamine and rescind the grant of the waiver at any time. A racetrack at which a permit holder has scheduled a standardbred horse race meeting within one year preceding the effective date of P.L.2018, c.33 (C.5:12A-10 et al.) and that met the definition of a racetrack under P.L.2018, c.33 (C.5:12A-10 et al.) on the effective date thereof: shall not be permitted to hold a sports wagering license as a former racetrack on or after the effective date of P.L.2021, c.350, and shall, as a condition of holding a sports wagering license after the effective date of P.L.2021, c.350, schedule annually no fewer than 151 standardbred race dates, except that the annual number of scheduled standardbred race dates may be decreased to no fewer than 75 standardbred race dates upon written consent from the Standardbred Breeders' and Owners' Association of New Jersey. A casino which holds a sports wagering license and a racetrack which holds a sports wagering license may enter into an agreement to jointly operate a sports pool at the racetrack, in accordance with the provisions of this act and applicable regulations promulgated pursuant to this act.  A casino or racetrack that holds a sports wagering license may conduct an online sports pool or may authorize an internet sports pool operator licensed as a casino service industry enterprise pursuant to section 92 of P.L.1977, c.110 (C.5:12-92), or an applicant for such license, to operate an online sports pool on its behalf provided the terms of the agreement are approved by the division; provided, however, that each sports wagering licensee may provide no more than three individually branded websites, each of which may have an accompanying mobile application bearing the same brand as the website for an online sports pool, those websites and mobile applications, in the case of a casino being in addition to or, in the discretion of the casino, in conjunction with, any websites and mobile applications that also offer other types of Internet gaming pursuant to P.L.2013, c.27 (C.5:12-95.17 et seq.).  No online sports pool shall be opened to the public, and no sports wagering, except for test purposes, may be conducted therein, until an Internet sports pool operator receives approval from the division to conduct an online sports pool on behalf of a casino or racetrack that holds a sports wagering license. Sports wagering licensees and operators may provide promotional credits, incentives, bonuses, complimentaries, or similar benefits designed to induce sports betters to wager.  The division, in consultation with the commission, shall establish by rule standards governing the provision of these measures. The server or other equipment used by a racetrack to accept wagers at a sports pool or online sports pool shall be located in that racetrack or in any location in Atlantic City which conforms to the requirements of section 20 of P.L.2013, c.27 (C.5:12-95.22) and any additional requirements which the division may impose by regulation.  The server or other equipment used by a casino to accept wagers at a sports pool or online sports pool shall conform to the requirements of section 20 of P.L.2013, c.27 (C.5:12-95.22) and any additional requirements which the division may impose by regulation. With regard to this act, P.L.2018, c.33 (C.5:12A-10 et al.), the duties specified in section 63 of P.L.1977, c.110 (C.5:12-63) of the Casino Control Commission shall apply to the extent not inconsistent with the provisions of this act.  In addition to the duties specified in section 76 of P.L.1977, c.110 (C.5:12-76), the division or racing commission, as required pursuant to this act, shall hear and decide promptly and in reasonable order all applications for a license to operate a sports pool.  In addition to the duties specified in section 76 of P.L.1977, c.110 (C.5:12-76), the division shall have the general responsibility for the implementation of this act, except with respect to the authority to issue sports wagering licenses to a racetrack as provided by this act, and shall have all other duties specified in that section with regard to the operation of a sports pool. The license to operate a sports pool shall be in addition to any other license required to be issued pursuant to P.L.1977, c.110 (C.5:12-1 et seq.) to operate a casino or pursuant to P.L.1940, c.17 (C.5:5-22 et seq.) to conduct horse racing.  The division and the racing commission shall each have the authority to charge a casino or a racetrack a fee for the issuance or, in the case of the division renewal, of a sports wagering license in an amount of $100,000 for initial issuance and in the case of a renewal a reasonable fee that is based upon the expense associated with renewal, enforcement, and gambling addiction programs.  No sports wagering license shall be issued by the division or racing commission to any entity unless it has established its financial stability, integrity and responsibility and its good character, honesty and integrity.  No casino or racetrack shall be permitted to operate a sports pool or accept wagers via an online sports pool unless a sports wagering lounge is established and has commenced operation in its facility; provided, however, that an applicant for a sports wagering license may petition the agency issuing the sports wagering license pursuant to this act to commence operation of the sports pool at a temporary facility and/or an online sports pool during the pendency of construction of a sports wagering lounge in its facility.  Such temporary facility may include, at the discretion of the agency issuing the sports wagering license pursuant to this act, the utilization of designated windows at the current casino cage or racetrack betting window for purposes of placing sports betting wagers and self-service wagering machines located at the racetrack or casino hotel complex.  No license to operate a sports pool shall be issued to any entity which is disqualified under the criteria of section 86 of P.L.1977, c.110 (C.5:12-86). No later than five years after the date of the issuance of a license and every five years thereafter or within such lesser periods as the agency issuing the sports wagering license pursuant to this act may direct, a licensee shall submit to the said agency such documentation or information as the division or racing commission may by regulation require, to demonstrate to the satisfaction of the agency that the licensee continues to meet the requirements of the law and regulations. The division and the racing commission following consultation with the sports wagering licensees, sport governing bodies, athletic conferences, and collegiate athletics programs shall annually cause a report to be prepared and distributed to the Governor on the impact of sports wagering, including Internet wagering on sports events, on problem gamblers, the harassment or coercion of participants in sporting events or other acts which affect the integrity of athletes or competitors, sporting or athletic competitions, or sports wagering operations, and gambling addiction in New Jersey.  The report shall be prepared by a private organization or entity with expertise in serving the needs of persons with gambling addictions, which organization or entity shall be selected jointly by the division and the racing commission.  The report shall be prepared and distributed under the supervision of, and in coordination with, the division and the racing commission.  Any costs associated with the preparation and distribution of the report shall be borne by casino and racetrack licensees who have been authorized by the division or the racing commission to conduct Internet gaming and the division and the racing commission shall be authorized to assess a fee against such licensees for these purposes.  The division and the racing commission may also report periodically to the Governor on the effectiveness of the statutory and regulatory controls in place to ensure the integrity of gaming operations through the Internet. b.    A sports pool shall be operated in a sports wagering lounge located at a casino or racetrack.  A sports wagering lounge may be located at a casino simulcasting facility.  The lounge shall conform to all requirements concerning square footage, design, equipment, security measures and related matters which the division shall by regulation prescribe.  The space required for the establishment of a lounge shall not reduce the space authorized for casino gaming activities as specified in section 83 of P.L.1977, c.110 (C.5:12-83). c.     No sports pool or online sports pool shall be offered or made available for wagering to the public by any entity other than a sports wagering licensee, pursuant to P.L.2018, c.33 (C.5:12A-10 et al.), an applicant for such license, operating such pool on behalf of a licensee, or an Internet sports pool operator, on behalf of a sports wagering licensee.  Any person who offers a sports pool or an online sports pool without approval of the division or racing commission to do so is guilty of a crime of the fourth degree and notwithstanding the provisions of N.J.S.2C:43-3, shall be subject to a fine of not more than $25,000 and in the case of a person other than a natural person, to a fine of not more than $100,000 and any other appropriate disposition authorized by subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:43-2. d.    The operator shall establish or display the odds at which wagers may be placed on sports events. e.     An operator shall accept wagers on sports events only from persons physically present in the sports wagering lounge; through self-service wagering machines located in its facility as authorized by the agency issuing the sports wagering license; or through an online sports pool.  A person placing a wager on a sports event shall be at least 21 years of age. f.  (1) Any person who is: an athlete, coach, referee, or director of a sports governing body or any of its member teams; a sports governing body or any of its member teams; a player or a referee personnel member, in or on any sports event overseen by that person's sports governing body based on publicly available information; a person who holds a position of authority or influence sufficient to exert influence over the participants in a sporting contest, including but not limited to coaches, managers, handlers, athletic trainers, or horse trainers; a person with access to certain types of exclusive information on any sports event overseen by that person's sports governing body based on publicly available information; or a person identified by any lists provided by the sports governing body to the division and the racing commission, shall not be permitted to have any ownership interest in, control of, or otherwise be employed by an operator, a sports wagering licensee, or a facility in which a sports wagering lounge is located or place a wager on a sports event that is overseen by that person's sports governing body based on publicly available information. Any employee of a sports governing body or its member teams who is not prohibited from wagering on a sports event shall, nevertheless, provide notice to the division prior to placing a wager on a sports event.  The direct or indirect legal or beneficial owner of 10 percent or more of a sports governing body shall not place or accept any wager on a sports event in which any member team of that sports governing body participates.  The direct or indirect legal or beneficial owner of 10 percent or more of a member team of a sports governing body shall not place or accept any wager on a sports event in which that member team participates.  Any person who violates this paragraph shall be guilty of a disorderly persons offense and shall be fined not less than $500 and not more than $1,000. (2)   The prohibition set forth in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall not apply to any person who is a direct or indirect owner of a specific sports governing body member team and (i) has less than 10 percent direct or indirect ownership interest in a casino or racetrack or (ii) the shares of such person are registered pursuant to section 12 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (15 U.S.C. s.78l), and the value of the ownership of such team represents less than one percent of the person's total enterprise value. (3)   An operator shall adopt procedures to prevent persons from wagering on sports events who are prohibited from placing sports wagers.  An operator shall not accept wagers from any person whose identity is known to the operator and: whose name appears on the exclusion list maintained by the division pursuant to section 71 of P.L.1977, c.110 (C.5:12-71); whose name appears on any self-exclusion list maintained by the division pursuant to sections 1 and 2 of P.L.2001, c.39 (C.5:12-71.2 and C.5:12-71.3, respectively); who is the operator, director, officer, owner, or employee of the operator or any relative thereof living in the same household as the operator; who has access to nonpublic confidential information held by the operator; or who is an agent or proxy for any other person. (4)   An operator shall adopt procedures to obtain personally identifiable information from any individual who places any single wager in an amount of $10,000 or greater on a sports event while physically present in a racetrack facility or a casino. Sections 1 and 2 of P.L.2002, c.89 (C.5:5-65.1 and C.5:5-65.2, respectively) shall apply to the conduct of sports wagering under this act. g.    The holder of a sports wagering license may contract with an entity to conduct that operation, in accordance with the regulations of and approval by the division.  That entity shall obtain a license as a casino service industry enterprise prior to the execution of any such contract, and such license shall be issued pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1977, c.110 (C.5:12-1 et seq.) and in accordance with the regulations promulgated by the division in consultation with the commission. That entity shall, upon approval of the division, expand on any initial license granted by the division prior to entering into any such contract.  The approval shall be in accordance with the terms and conditions set forth by the division. h.    If any provision of this act, P.L.2018, c.33 (C.5:12A-10 et al.), or its application to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable. i.     An operator shall promptly report to the division: any criminal or disciplinary proceedings commenced against the operator or its employees in connection with the operations of the sports pool or online sports pool; any abnormal betting activity or patterns that may indicate a concern about the integrity of a sports event or events; any other conduct with the potential to corrupt a betting outcome of a sports event for purposes of financial gain, including but not limited to the harassment or coercion of participants in any sporting event or athletic competitions, match fixing; and suspicious or illegal wagering activities, including the use of funds derived from illegal activity, wagers to conceal or launder funds derived from illegal activity, use of agents to place wagers, or use of false identification. The division is authorized to share any information under this section with any law enforcement entity, team, sports governing body, independent sports wagering monitoring service, or regulatory agency the division deems appropriate. j.     An operator shall maintain records of sports wagering operations in accordance with regulations promulgated by the division.  The operator, with prior written approval from the division, shall contract with an independent sports wagering monitoring service to review such records and to ensure the integrity of the operators sports wagering operations.  The independent sports wagering monitoring service shall provide quarterly reports of their findings to the division. k.    A sports wagering licensee may, in addition to having a sports wagering lounge, conduct wagering on authorized sports events through one or more kiosks or self-service wagering stations located within its facility.  Such self-service wagering stations located at a casino may offer any game authorized under rules established by the division.  Such self-service wagering stations located at a racetrack may offer wagering only on authorized sports events and horse races. l.     All wagers on sports events authorized under this provision shall be initiated, received and otherwise made within this State unless otherwise determined by the division in accordance with applicable federal and State laws.  Consistent with the intent of the United States Congress as articulated in the Unlawful Internet Gambling Enforcement Act of 2006 (31 U.S.C. s.5361 et seq.), the intermediate routing of electronic data relating to a lawful intrastate wager authorized under this provision shall not determine the location or locations in which such wager is initiated, received or otherwise made. m.   A sports wagering licensee shall not accept any wager on any sports event unless the sports event has been approved for wagering by the director.  Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, no sports event shall be approved for wagering unless the director has certified that the sports event has appropriate policies and procedures to monitor the integrity of the athletes or competitors including the prevention of coercion or harassment of athletes or competitors.  In the absence of such certification, the director shall impose a wager limit of not more than $100 or a win limit of $500, whichever is greater, on the amount permitted to be wagered or won on such competitions or contests by any individual. (cf: P.L.2021, c.350, s.1) 2.    Section 4 of P.L.2018, c.33 (C.5:12A-13) is amended to read as follows: 4.  a.  Except as otherwise provided by this act, the division shall have the authority to regulate sports pools, online sports pools, and the conduct of sports wagering under this act to the same extent that the division regulates casino games.  No casino or racetrack shall be authorized to operate a sports pool or online sports pool unless it has produced, to the satisfaction of the agency issuing the sports wagering license, information, documentation, and assurances concerning its financial background and resources, including cash reserves, that are sufficient to demonstrate that it has the financial stability, integrity, and responsibility to operate a sports pool or online sports pool.  In developing rules and regulations applicable to sports wagering, the division may examine the regulations implemented in other states where sports wagering is conducted and may, as far as practicable, adopt a similar regulatory framework.  The division, in consultation with the commission, shall promulgate regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this act, including, but not limited to, regulations governing the: (1)   amount of cash reserves to be maintained by operators to cover winning wagers; (2)   acceptance of wagers on a series of sports events; (3)   maximum wagers which may be accepted by an operator from any one patron on any one sports event; (4)   type of wagering tickets which may be used; (5)   method of issuing tickets; (6)   method of accounting to be used by operators; (7)   types of records which shall be kept; (8)   use of credit and checks by patrons; (9)   type of system for wagering; (10) protections for a person placing a wager; [and] (11) display of the words, "If you or someone you know has a gambling problem and wants help, call 1-800 GAMBLER," or some comparable language approved by the division, which language shall include the words "gambling problem" and "call 1-800 GAMBLER," in all print, billboard, sign, online, or broadcast advertisements of a sports pool and online sports pool and in every sports wagering lounge; (12) display of the telephone number for the telephone hotline to report instances of harassment, coercive behavior, or any activities which may be detrimental to the integrity of athletes or competitors, sporting or athletic competitions, or sports wagering operations, established pursuant to subsection d. of this section, in all print, billboard, sign, online, or broadcast advertisements of a sports pool and online sports pool and in every sports wagering lounge; (13) sports pool related advertising of sports wagering licensees, their employees and agents, and their contracted operators, to ensure their advertisements are not deceptive or fraudulent and do not appeal directly to, or feature, individuals under the legal age to wager; and (14) sports pool related advertising of sports wagering licensees, their employees and agents, and their contracted operators, to ensure that such advertisements warn users of any prohibited actions related to sports wagering, identify where and how an individual may report the conduct of any prohibited actions, and the consequences of engaging in any prohibited conduct. b.    [Notwithstanding any other provision of P.L.2018, c.33 (C.5:12A-10 et al.) or of the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), to the contrary, during the 90-day period following the effective date of this act, the division and the racing commission may, after notice provided in accordance with this subsection, summarily adopt, amend, or repeal any order, rule, or regulation for a period not to exceed 270 days for the purpose of ensuring the expeditious and effective implementation of sports wagering at casinos or racetracks in accordance with this act.  Any summary rulemaking authorized by this subsection shall be subject to such terms and conditions as the division and the racing commission may deem appropriate.  Such rules shall be effective when published by the division and the racing commission on their respective websites and shall allow for the immediate application of any racetrack licensed by the racing commission, or casino licensed by the division, to the respective agency by which they are licensed or permitted, for a transactional waiver to immediately commence sports wagering.  Upon the filing of such application, these rules shall further provide that, upon a showing therein that the applicant is licensed or permitted by the appropriate agency, a sports wagering license shall immediately be issued to the respective applicant allowing for its immediate commencement of sports wagering subject to the condition that it conform to the entity and individual or other licensing, facility and any other requirements set forth in the respective rules of each within 270 days. In the event such rules are not complied with within such time period, the non-complying racetrack or casino will not thereafter be eligible to conduct sports wagering until such compliance is achieved. Notice of any emergency rulemaking action taken by the division or the racing commission pursuant to this subsection shall be published in the New Jersey Register, and provided to the newspapers designated by the division and racing commission pursuant to subsection d. of section 3 of P.L.1975, c.231 (C.10:4-8), not later than 30 days subsequent to the implementation of the emergency rules. The text of any emergency rule adopted by the division and the racing commission pursuant to this section shall be available in each racetrack, casino, sports wagering lounge, and simulcasting facility implementing the provisions of emergency rulemaking.] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.        , c.       ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). c.     Any person employed on the effective date of this act, P.L.2018, c.33 (C.5:12A-10 et al.), by a permitholder in the admissions department or parimutuel clerk department of a racetrack operated by the permitholder shall be given a one-time right of first refusal offer of employment at the sports pool, including an online sports pool, that opens at that racetrack, for the then available positions of similar employment in that sports pool, or with any vendor contracting with the licensee to operate the sports pool. d.    The division shall create and maintain a telephone hotline and other intake methods which allow individuals to report instances of harassment, coercive behavior, or any activities which may be detrimental to the integrity of athletes or competitors, sporting or athletic competitions, or sports wagering operations. The division shall investigate such reports and, upon a credible finding that an individual has engaged in the alleged prohibited conduct, may take appropriate remedial action, including: (1)  exclusion of the person or persons from engaging in sports wagering activities conducted by sports wagering licensees in this State, or their contractor operators; (2)  referral to the relevant sport governing body for further action; and (3)  referral to law enforcement or the Attorney General for a criminal investigation. Prior to undertaking any action pursuant to this section, the division shall serve notice to the person or persons subject to the action by certified mail delivered to the last known address of such person or persons and, if requested by the person or persons within 30 days of such service, shall conduct a hearing before the director, or the directors designee, to affirmatively determine that such action is necessary. If, upon completion of the hearing, the director, or the directors designee, determines that exclusion pursuant to paragraph (1) of this section is appropriate, the director shall make and enter an order to that effect and the director shall notify all sports wagering licensees in this State, and their contracted operators, that the person or persons subject to exclusion shall not be permitted to engage in sports wagering activities.  Such order shall be subject to review by the Superior Court in accordance with the rules of court. Any sports wagering licensee or contracted operator who fails to exclude such person shall be subject to penalties, as determined by the division. e.     The division shall promulgate, in accordance with the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), all rules and regulations as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this section. (cf: P.L.2018, c.33, s.4) 3.  This act shall take effect 60 days following the date of enactment.